Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 3
PLEA DISCUSSIONS AND PLEA AGREEMENTS

Law reviews:

For article, "Felony Plea Bargaining in Six Colorado Judicial Districts: A Limited Inquiry into the Nature of the Process", see 66 Den. U.L. Rev. 243 (1989).

16-7-301. Propriety of plea discussions and plea agreements.

Where it appears that the effective administration of criminal justice will thereby be served, the district attorney may engage in plea discussions for the purpose of reaching a plea agreement. The district attorney should engage in plea discussions or reach plea agreements with the defendant only through or in the presence of defense counsel except where the defendant is not eligible for appointment of counsel because the defendant is not indigent or the charged offense does not include a possible sentence of incarceration or because the defendant refuses appointment of counsel and has not retained counsel.

The district attorney may agree to one or more of the following, depending upon the circumstances of the individual case:

To make or not to oppose favorable recommendations concerning the sentence to be imposed if the defendant enters a plea of guilty or nolo contendere (no contest);

To seek or not to oppose the dismissal of an offense charged if the defendant enters a plea of guilty or nolo contendere (no contest) to another offense reasonably related to the defendant's conduct;

To seek or not to oppose the dismissal of other charges or not to prosecute other potential charges against the defendant if the defendant enters a plea of guilty or nolo contendere (no contest);

To consent to diversion, as provided in section 18-1.3-101, C.R.S.;

To consent to deferred sentencing, as provided in section 18-1.3-102, C.R.S.;

To consent to an assessment for suitability for participation in restorative justice practices, including victim-offender conferences.

Defendants whose situations are similar should be afforded similar opportunities for plea agreement.

Repealed.

Any plea agreement in a case involving a plea to a violation of article 18 of title 18, C.R.S., may not require a waiver by the defendant of the right to petition to have the defendant's criminal conviction records sealed pursuant to part 3 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 223, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-7-301.

L. 75:

IP(2) amended and (2)(d) and (2)(e) added, p. 609, § 1, effective March 12.

L. 92:

(1) amended and (4) added, p. 465, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(4) amended, p. 1285, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2)(d) and (2)(e) amended, p. 1491, § 135, effective October 1.

L. 2013:

(2)(d) amended, (HB 13-1156), ch. 336, p. 1957, § 4, effective August 7; (5) added, (SB 13-250), ch. 333, p. 1925, § 32, effective October 1; (1) amended and (4) repealed, (HB 13-1210), ch. 306, p. 1622, § 1, effective January 1, 2014.

L. 2017:

(2)(f) added, (HB 17-1039), ch. 58, p. 183, § 3, effective August 9.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsections (2)(d) and (2)(e), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-7-302. Responsibilities of the trial judge with respect to plea discussions and agreements.

The trial judge shall not participate in plea discussions.

If a tentative plea agreement has been reached which contemplates entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere (no contest) in the expectation that other charges before that court will be dismissed or that sentence concessions will be granted, the trial judge may, upon request of the parties, permit the disclosure to him of the tentative agreement and the reasons therefor in advance of the time for tender of the plea. He may then indicate to the district attorney and defense counsel or defendant whether he will concur in the proposed disposition if the information in the presentence report is consistent with the representations made to him. If the trial judge concurs but later decides that the final disposition should not include the charge or sentence concessions contemplated by the plea agreement, he shall so advise the defendant and then call upon the defendant to either affirm or withdraw his plea of guilty or nolo contendere (no contest).

Notwithstanding the reaching of a plea agreement between the district attorney and defense counsel or defendant, the judge in every case should exercise an independent judgment in deciding whether to grant charge and sentence concessions.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 223, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-7-302.

16-7-303. Fact of discussion and agreement not admissible.

Except as to proceedings resulting from a plea of guilty or nolo contendere (no contest) which is not withdrawn, the fact that the defendant or his defense counsel and the district attorney engaged in plea discussions or made a plea agreement shall not be received in evidence against or in favor of the defendant in any criminal or civil action or administrative proceeding.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 224, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-7-303.

16-7-304. Charges for bad checks.

The department or agency supervising the collection of restitution agreed to as a condition of a plea agreement, including dismissal of a charge, may assess a charge of fifteen dollars to a defendant for collection of each bad check or each bad check received as a restitution payment. For the purposes of this section, "bad check" means a check or similar sight order for the payment of money which is dishonored by the bank or other drawee because the issuer does not have sufficient funds upon deposit with the bank or other drawee to pay the check or order upon presentation within thirty days after issue.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 488, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 620, § 1, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For charges for bad checks received as a restitution payment ordered as a condition of a deferred prosecution or deferred sentence, see § 16-7-404; for assessment of a penalty for a dishonored check presented as a payment for restitution, see § 16-18.5-108.